Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB237.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.382 is amended to read as follows:
A person certified after December 1, 1998, under KRS 15.380 to 15.404 or qualified under the requirements set forth
in KRS 15.440(1)(d)6. shall, at the time of becoming certified, meet the following minimum qualifications:
(1) Be a citizen of the United States;
(2) Be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(3) (a) Be a high school graduate, regardless of whether the school is accredited or certified by a governing
body, provided that the education received met the attendance and curriculum standards of Kentucky
law at the time of graduation, as determined by the Kentucky Department of Education; or
(b) Possess a High School Equivalency Diploma;
(4) Possess a valid license to operate a motor vehicle;
(5) Be fingerprinted for a criminal background check;
(6) Not have been convicted of any felony; a misdemeanor under KRS 510.120, 510.130, or 510.140; a second or
subsequent offense under KRS 510.148; or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to
commit any degree of rape, sodomy, sexual abuse, or sexual misconduct; or have had any offense listed under
this subsection expunged;
(7) Not be prohibited by federal or state law from possessing a firearm;
(8) Have received and read the Kentucky Law Enforcement Officers Code of Ethics as established by the council;
(9) Have not received a dishonorable discharge, bad conduct discharge, or general discharge under other than
honorable conditions, if having served in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States;
(10) Have passed a medical examination as defined by the council by administrative regulation and provided by a
licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse to determine if he or she can
perform peace officer duties as determined by a validated job task analysis. However, if the employing agency
has its own validated job task analysis, the person shall pass the medical examination, appropriate to the
agency's job task analysis, of the employing agency. All agencies shall certify passing medical examination
results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(11) Have passed a drug screening test administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation. A
person shall be deemed to have passed a drug screening test if the results of the test are negative for the use of
an illegal controlled substance or prescription drug abuse. Any agency that administers its own test that meets
or exceeds this standard shall certify passing test results to the council, which shall accept them as complying
with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(12) Have undergone a background investigation established or approved by the council by administrative
regulation to determine suitability for the position of a peace officer. If the employing agency has established
its own background investigation that meets or exceeds the standards of the council, as set forth by
administrative regulation, the agency shall conduct the background investigation and shall certify background
investigation results to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(13) Have been interviewed by the employing agency;
(14) Not have had certification as a peace officer permanently revoked in another state;
(15) Have taken a psychological suitability screening administered or approved by the council by administrative
regulation to determine the person's suitability to perform peace officer duties as determined by a council
validated job task analysis. However, if the employing agency has its own validated job task analysis, the
person shall take that agency's psychological suitability screening[examination], appropriate to the agency's
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
job task analysis. All agencies shall certify psychological suitability screening[examination] results to the
council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to 15.510;
(16) (a) Have passed a physical agility test administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation
to determine his or her suitability to perform peace officer duties as determined by a council validated
job task analysis. However, if the employing agency has its own validated job task analysis, the person
shall take the physical agility test[examination] of the employing agency. All agencies shall certify
physical agility test[examination] results to the council, which shall accept them as demonstrating
compliance with KRS 15.310 to 15.510.[; and]
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a person shall not be required to pass a physical
agility test if the person can provide certified documentation that at the time of his or her application
to the employing agency, the person:
1. Is currently employed, or has been separated from service for less than three (3) months, as a
certified law enforcement officer in another state;
2. Is currently in good standing, or separated from service in good standing, with the other state
or law enforcement agency where he or she is certified;
3. Has been continuously employed as a law enforcement officer in the state where he or she is
certified for at least ten (10) years prior to his or her application; and
4. Has passed a physical agility test as a condition of employment with the law enforcement
agency in the other state where he or she is certified; and
(17) Have taken a polygraph examination administered or approved by the council by administrative regulation to
determine his or her suitability to perform peace officer duties. Any agency that administers its own polygraph
examination as approved by the council shall certify the results that indicate whether a person is suitable for
employment as a peace officer to the council, which shall accept them as complying with KRS 15.310 to
15.510.
Section 2. KRS 15.530 (Effective until July 1, 2026) is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 15.530 to 15.590:
(1) "CJIS" means the Criminal Justice Information System;
(2) "CJIS-full access course" means an online[a] training program administered and[of forty (40) hours]
approved by the Kentucky State Police CJIS Services Agency[Kentucky Law Enforcement Council];
(3) ["CJIS telecommunicator" means any public employee, sworn or civilian, whose primary responsibility is to
dispatch law enforcement units by means of radio communications for an agency that utilizes the Criminal
Justice Information System, and is part of or administered by the state or any political subdivision;
(4) ]"Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training;
(4)[(5)] "Public safety telecommunicator" or "telecommunicator" means any public employee, sworn or
civilian, who functions as a public safety dispatcher, 911 telecommunicator, or 911 call taker, whose duties
and responsibilities include:
(a) Answering, receiving, transferring, or dispatching functions related to 911 calls, as the primary or
secondary public safety answering point or emergency communication center;
(b) Dispatching law enforcement officers, fire rescue services, emergency medical services, emergency
management, and other public safety services to the scene of an emergency; or
(c) Providing real-time information from federal, state, and local crime databases;["Non-CJIS
telecommunicator" means any full-time public employee, sworn or civilian, whose primary
responsibility is to dispatch law enforcement units by means of radio communications for an agency
that does not utilize the Criminal Justice Information System and is part of or administered by the state
or any political subdivision;
(6) "Non-CJIS telecommunicator academy" means a training course of one hundred twenty (120) hours approved
by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council; and]
(5)[(7)] "Telecommunications academy" means a training course of one hundred sixty (160) hours approved by
the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council; and

CHAPTER 53 3
(6) "Telecommunicator overview training" means a forty (40) hour online course approved by the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Council.
Section 3. KRS 15.530 (Effective July 1, 2026) is amended to read as follows:
For the purposes of KRS 15.530 to 15.590:
(1) "CJIS" means the Criminal Justice Information System;
(2) "CJIS-full access course" means an online training program administered and approved by the Kentucky State
Police CJIS Services Agency;
(3) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Criminal Justice Training;
(4) "Full-time public safety telecommunicator academy" means a training course of at least one hundred sixty
(160) hours approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and delivered by one (1) of the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Council-approved academies in the state;
(5) "Public safety telecommunicator" or "telecommunicator" means any public employee, sworn or civilian, who
functions as a public safety dispatcher, 911 telecommunicator, or 911 call taker, whose duties and
responsibilities include:
(a) Answering, receiving, transferring, or dispatching functions related to 911 calls, as the primary or
secondary public safety answering point or emergency communication center;
(b) Dispatching law enforcement officers, fire rescue services, emergency medical services, emergency
management, and other public safety services to the scene of an emergency; or
(c) Providing real-time information from federal, state, and local crime databases; and[
(5) "Public safety telecommunicator academy" means a training course of at least one hundred sixty (160) hours
approved by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council and delivered by one (1) of the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council-approved academies in the state]
(6) "Telecommunicator overview training" means a forty (40) hour online course approved by the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Council.
Section 4. KRS 15.552 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Public Safety Telecommunicator Work Group is hereby established as an independent entity to develop a
new delivery format for the public safety telecommunicator academy which will incorporate in-person and
online training components. The work group shall meet as necessary and submit to the Kentucky Law
Enforcement Council within one (1) year of July 15, 2024, a training delivery format that shall be developed
and unanimously agreed upon by the work group. The work group shall cease to exist after the developed
training delivery format is submitted to the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council for approval unless the
council directs its continuance. The members of the work group shall not be paid or reimbursed for travel or
other expenses. The work group shall consist of at least one (1) member of the following entities:
(a) Department of Criminal Justice Training;
(b) Kentucky Chapter of the National Emergency Number Association; and
(c) Association of Public Safety Communications Officials.
(2) The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall, upon approval, implement the new training delivery format
developed under subsection (1) of this section for the public safety telecommunicator academy on July 1,
2026.
(3) All part-time telecommunicators[ hired prior to July 1, 2026,] shall successfully complete the forty (40) hour
online course, "telecommunicator overview training." [All part-time telecommunicators hired after July 1,
2026, shall successfully complete the public safety telecommunicator academy]
(4) A part-time telecommunicator who successfully completes the forty (40) hour telecommunicator overview
training course and moves to a full-time telecommunicator position shall be credited forty (40) hours
toward the training requirements of the full-time public safety telecommunicator academy.
Section 5. KRS 15.560 (Effective July 1, 2026) is amended to read as follows:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) (a) All full-time public safety telecommunicators not previously certified as a telecommunicator by the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall complete the full-time public safety telecommunicator
academy within twelve (12) months from the date of hire.
(b) All part-time public safety telecommunicators not previously certified as a telecommunicator by the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall complete telecommunicator overview training within
twelve (12) months from the date of hire.
(2) All public safety telecommunicators shall successfully complete each calendar year an in-service training
course, appropriate to their job assignment and responsibility, of eight (8) hours' duration at a school certified
or recognized by the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council. Each in-service training course shall include a
mental health component which highlights post-traumatic stress disorder and work-induced stress, including
symptom recognition, treatment, and available resources.
(3) In the event of extenuating circumstances beyond the control of a telecommunicator that prevent completion of
training within the time specified, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee may grant the
telecommunicator an extension of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days, in which to complete the
training.
(4) A telecommunicator who fails to complete the training within a period of twelve (12) months and any
extension of time granted under this section shall be terminated by the employing agency and shall not be
permitted to serve as a telecommunicator with any governmental agency in the Commonwealth for a period of
one (1) year.
Section 6. KRS 164.952 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Police officer" has the same meaning as "police officer" in KRS 15.420, as "police officer" in KRS
164.950 to 164.980, and as "officer" in KRS 16.010; and
(b) "Postsecondary institution" means any public institution of postsecondary education authorized to
establish a police department pursuant to KRS 164.950 to 164.980 that participates in the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System.
(2) [Subject to the limitations of subsection (7) of this section, ]A postsecondary institution may employ
individuals as police officers under this section who have retired from the Kentucky Employees Retirement
System, the County Employees Retirement System, or the State Police Retirement System.
(3) To be eligible for employment under this section, an individual shall have:
(a) Participated in the Law Enforcement Foundation Program fund under KRS 15.410 to 15.510, retired as
a commissioned officer pursuant to KRS Chapter 16, or retired as a police officer from a postsecondary
institution;
(b) Retired with at least twenty (20) years of service credit;
(c) Been separated from service for the period required by KRS 61.637 or 78.5540 so that the member's
retirement is not voided;
(d) Retired with no administrative charges pending; and
(e) Retired with no preexisting agreement between the individual and the postsecondary institution prior to
the individual's retirement for the individual to return to work for the postsecondary institution.
(4) Individuals employed under this section shall:
(a) Serve for a term not to exceed one (1) year. The one (1) year employment term may be renewed
annually at the discretion of the employing postsecondary institution;
(b) Receive compensation according to the standard procedures applicable to the employing postsecondary
institution; and
(c) Be employed based upon need as determined by the employing postsecondary institution.
(5) Notwithstanding any provisions of KRS 16.505 to 16.652, 18A.225 to 18A.2287, 61.510 to 61.705, or 78.510
to 78.852 to the contrary:

CHAPTER 53 5
(a) Individuals employed under this section shall continue to receive all retirement and health insurance
benefits to which they were entitled upon retiring in the applicable system administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems;
(b) Individuals employed under this section shall not be eligible to receive health insurance coverage
through the employing postsecondary institution;
(c) The postsecondary institution shall not pay any employer contributions or retiree health expense
reimbursements to the Kentucky Retirement Systems required by KRS 61.637(17) for individuals
employed under this section; and
(d) The postsecondary institution shall not pay any insurance contributions to the state health insurance
plan, as provided by KRS 18A.225 to 18A.2287, for individuals employed under this section.
(6) Individuals employed under this section shall be subject to any legislative due process provisions applicable to
police officers of the employing postsecondary institution. A decision not to renew a one (1) year appointment
term under this section shall not be considered a disciplinary action or deprivation subject to due process.[
(7) The number of retired police officers a postsecondary institution may hire under the provisions of this section
shall be limited to five (5) retired police officers or a number equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the police
officers employed by the postsecondary institution in calendar year 2018, whichever is greater.]
Section 7. Sections 3 and 5 of this Act take effect July 1, 2026.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version